Washington statutes.
RCW 35.91.025

Extension outside city subject to review by boundary review board.

The extension of water or sewer facilities outside of the boundaries of a city or town may be subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

[ 1989 c 84 s 33.]